Wyoming statutes. Title 20 Domestic Relations
Article 1. General Provisions
§ 20-4-178.
Procedure to contest validity or enforcement of registered order.

A nonregistering party seeking to contest the validity or enforcement of a registered support order in this state shall request a hearing within the time required by W.S.

20-4-177

. The nonregistering party may seek to vacate the registration, to assert any defense to an allegation of noncompliance with the registered order, or to contest the remedies being sought or the amount of any alleged arrearages pursuant to W.S.

20-4-179

.

If the nonregistering party fails to contest the validity or enforcement of the registered support order in a timely manner, the order is confirmed by operation of law.

If a nonregistering party requests a hearing to contest the validity or enforcement of the registered support order, the registering tribunal shall schedule the matter for hearing and give notice to the parties of the date, time and place of the hearing.

History.

Laws 1995, ch. 148, § 1; 1998, ch. 97, § 2; 2001, ch. 5, § 1; 2015 ch. 75, § 2, effective March 2, 2015.

The 2015 amendment,

inserted “support” in (b) and (c); and rewrote the first sentence in (a).

Laws 2015, ch. 75, § 6, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 2, 2015.

§ 20-4-179.
Contest of registration or enforcement.

A party contesting the validity or enforcement of a registered support order or seeking to vacate the registration has the burden of proving one (1) or more of the following defenses:

The issuing tribunal lacked personal jurisdiction over the contesting party;

The order was obtained by fraud;

The order has been vacated, suspended or modified by a later order;

The issuing tribunal has stayed the order pending appeal;

There is a defense under the law of this state to the remedy sought;

Full or partial payment has been made;

The statute of limitations under W.S.

20-4-176

precludes enforcement of some or all of the alleged arrearages; or

The alleged controlling order is not the controlling order.

If a party presents evidence establishing a full or partial defense under subsection (a) of this section, a tribunal may stay enforcement of a registered support order, continue the proceeding to permit production of additional relevant evidence and issue other appropriate orders. An uncontested portion of the registered support order may be enforced by all remedies available under the laws of this state.

If the contesting party does not establish a defense under subsection (a) of this section to the validity or enforcement of a registered support order, the registering tribunal shall issue an order confirming the order.

History.

Laws 1995, ch. 148, § 1; 1998, ch. 97, § 2; 2005, ch. 103, § 2; 2015 ch. 75, § 2, effective March 2, 2015.

The 2005 amendment,

effective July 1, 2005, added (a)(viii) and made related changes.

The 2015 amendment,

inserted “support” in the introductory language of (a) and (b); in (a)(vii), inserted “alleged”; in (c), inserted “to the validity or enforcement of a registered support order”; and made related and stylistic changes.

Laws 2015, ch. 75, § 6, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 2, 2015.

Lack of personal jurisdiction. —

Husband could not contest the validity of a Utah child support order being registered in Wyoming where the record contained no evidence that he ever challenged the exercise of personal jurisdiction over him by the Utah court, but instead the Utah court's findings of fact indicated that he actively and voluntarily participated in the proceedings before that court by filing pleadings, stipulating to the transfer of subject matter jurisdiction over support issues, and participating in the proceedings on the merits. Walton v. State ex rel. Utah ex rel. Wood, 2002 WY 108, 50 P.3d 693,

2002 Wyo. LEXIS 114

(Wyo. 2002).

§ 20-4-180.
Confirmed order.

Confirmation of a registered support order, whether by operation of law or after notice and hearing, precludes further contest of the order with respect to any matter that could have been asserted at the time of registration.

History.

Laws 1995, ch. 148, § 1; 2015 ch. 75, § 2, effective March 2, 2015.

The 2015 amendment,

inserted “support.”

Laws 2015, ch. 75, § 6, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 2, 2015.

§ 20-4-181.
Procedure to register child support order of another state or foreign country for modification.

A party or support enforcement agency seeking to modify, or to modify and enforce, a child support order issued in another state shall register that order in this state in the same manner provided in W.S.

20-4-173

through

20-4-180

if the order has not been registered. A petition for modification may be filed at the same time as a request for registration, or later. The petition shall specify the grounds for modification.

A party or support enforcement agency seeking to modify, or to modify and enforce, a foreign child support order not under the convention may register that order under W.S.

20-4-173

through

20-4-180

if the order has not been registered. A petition for modification may be filed at the same time as a request for registration, or at another time. The petition shall specify the grounds for modification.

History.

Laws 1995, ch. 148, § 1; 2015 ch. 75, § 2, effective March 2, 2015.

The 2015 amendment,

in (a), substituted “W.S.

20-4-173

through

20-4-180

” for “W.S.

20-4-173

through

20-4-176

” in the first sentence, and substituted “petition” for “pleading” in the last sentence;
and added (b).

Laws 2015, ch. 75, § 6, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by
art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 2, 2015.

§ 20-4-182.
Effect of registration for modification.

A tribunal of this state may enforce a child support order of another state registered for purposes of modification, in the same manner as if the order had been issued by a tribunal of this state, but the registered order may be modified only if the requirements of W.S.

20-4-183

or

20-4-193

have been met.

History.

Laws 1995, ch. 148, § 1; 1998, ch. 97, § 2; 2005, ch. 103, § 2; 2015 ch. 75, § 2, effective March 2, 2015.

The 2005 amendment,

effective July 1, 2005, inserted “20-4-193 or

20-4-197

” and made a stylistic change.

The 2015 amendment,

substituted “W.S.

20-4-183

or

20-4-193

” for “W.S.

20-4-183

,

20-4-193

or

20-4-197

.”

Laws 2015, ch. 75, § 6, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 2, 2015.

§ 20-4-183.
Modification of child support order of another state.

If W.S.

20-4-193

does not apply, upon petition a tribunal of this state may modify a child support order issued in another state which is registered in this state if, after notice and hearing, the tribunal finds that:

Repealed by Laws 2005, ch. 103, § 3.

The following requirements are met:

Neither the child, the obligee who is an individual nor the obligor resides in the issuing state;

A petitioner who is a nonresident of this state seeks modification; and

The respondent is subject to the personal jurisdiction of the tribunal of this state; or

This state is the state of residence of the child, or a party who is an individual is subject to the personal jurisdiction of the tribunal of this state and all of the parties who are individuals have filed consents in a record in the issuing tribunal for a tribunal of this state to modify the support order and assume continuing, exclusive jurisdiction.

Modification of a registered child support order is subject to the same requirements, procedures and defenses that apply to the modification of an order issued by a tribunal of this state and the order may be enforced and satisfied in the same manner.

A tribunal of this state may not modify any aspect of a child support order that may not be modified under the law of the issuing state, including the duration of the obligation for support. If two (2) or more tribunals have issued child support orders for the same obligor and same child, the order that controls and shall be so recognized under W.S.

20-4-148

establishes the aspects of the support order which are nonmodifiable.

In a proceeding to modify a child support order, the law of the state that is determined to have issued the initial controlling order governs the duration of the obligation of support. The obligor’s fulfillment of the duty of support established by that order precludes imposition of a further obligation of support by a tribunal of this state.

On issuance of an order by a tribunal of this state modifying a child support order issued in another state, the tribunal of this state becomes the tribunal having continuing, exclusive jurisdiction.

Notwithstanding subsections (a) through (e) of this section and W.S. 20-4-142(b), a tribunal of this state retains jurisdiction to modify an order issued by a tribunal of this state if:

One (1) party resides in another state; and

The other party resides outside the United States.

History.

Laws 1995, ch. 148, § 1; 1998, ch. 97, § 2; 2005, ch. 103, §§ 2, 3; 2015 ch. 75, § 2, effective March 2, 2015.

The 2005 amendment,

effective July 1, 2005, rewrote (a) by inserting the exception language at the beginning, repealing former (a)(i) which pertained to consent, and adding (a)(iii); in (c) added the exception language at the beginning, and inserted “same”; inserted (d), redesignating former (d) as (e); in present (e), inserted “by a tribunal of this state”; and made a stylistic change.

The 2015 amendment,

deleted “except as otherwise provided in W.S.

20-4-197

” in the introductory language of (a) and (b); in (c), inserted “including the duration of the obligation for support”; added (f); and made related changes.

Laws 2015, ch. 75, § 6, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 2, 2015.

§ 20-4-184.
Recognition of order modified in another state.

If a child support order issued by a tribunal of this state is modified by a tribunal of another state which assumed jurisdiction pursuant to the Uniform Interstate Family Support Act, a tribunal of this state:

May enforce its order that was modified only as to arrearages and interest accruing before the modification;

Repealed by Laws 2005, ch. 103, § 3.

May provide appropriate relief for violations of its order which occurred before the effective date of the modification; and

Shall recognize the modifying order of the other state, upon registration, for the purpose of enforcement.

History.

Laws 1995, ch. 148, § 1; 1998, ch. 97, § 2; 2005, ch. 103, §§ 2, 3.

The 2005 amendment,

effective July 1, 2005, in (a), added “If a child support order issued by a,” substituted “is modified” for “shall recognize a modification of its earlier child support order,” deleted “this act or a law substantially similar to,” substituted “a tribunal of this state” for “and, upon request, except as otherwise provided in this act, shall”; substituted “arrearages and interest” for “amounts” in (a)(i); repealed former (a)(ii) which read, “Enforce only nonmodifiable aspects of that order”; and made stylistic changes.

Editor's notes. —

There is no subsection (b) in this section as it appears in the printed acts.

§ 20-4-185.
Proceeding to determine parentage.

A tribunal of this state authorized to determine parentage of a child may serve as a responding tribunal in a proceeding to determine parentage of a child brought under this act or a law or procedure substantially similar to this act.

Repealed by Laws 2005, ch. 103, § 3.

History.

Laws 1995, ch. 148, § 1; 1998, ch. 97, § 2; 2003, ch. 93, § 2; 2005, ch. 103, §§ 2, 3; 2015 ch. 75, § 2, effective March 2, 2015.

The 2005 amendment,

effective July 1, 2005, rewrote the section to conform with changes proposed by the National Conference of Commissioners on Uniform State Laws, including repealing former (b), which had provided for application of §§

14-2-401

through

14-2-907

to determine parentage.

The 2015 amendment,

in (a), substituted “A tribunal” for “A court,” inserted “of a child,” and substituted “this act” for “the Uniform Interstate Family Support Act.”

Laws 2015, ch. 75, § 6, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 2, 2015.

Meaning of “this act.” —

For the definition of “this act,” referred to in this section, see § 20-4-140(a)(xxii).

§ 20-4-186.
Grounds for rendition.

For purposes of W.S.

20-4-186

and

20-4-187

, “governor” includes an individual performing the functions of the governor or the executive authority of a state covered by this act.

The governor of this state may:

Demand that the governor of another state surrender an individual found in the other state who is charged criminally in this state with having failed to provide for the support of an obligee; or

On the demand of the governor of another state surrender an individual found in this state who is charged criminally in the other state with having failed to provide for the support of an obligee.

A provision for extradition of individuals not inconsistent with this act applies to the demand even if the individual whose surrender is demanded was not in the demanding state when the crime was allegedly committed and has not fled therefrom.

History.

Laws 1995, ch. 148, § 1; 1998, ch. 97, § 2; 2005, ch. 103, § 2; 2015 ch. 75, § 2, effective March 2, 2015.

The 2005 amendment,

effective July 1, 2005, made a stylistic change in (b)(ii).

The 2015 amendment,

in (a), substituted “this act” for “the Uniform Interstate Family Support Act.”

Laws 2015, ch. 75, § 6, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 2, 2015.

Meaning of “this act.” —

For the meaning of “this act,” referred to in this section, see § 20-4-140(a)(xxii).

§ 20-4-187.
Conditions of rendition.

Before making demand that the governor of another state surrender an individual charged criminally in this state with having failed to provide for the support of an obligee, the governor of this state may require a prosecutor of this state to demonstrate that at least sixty (60) days previously the obligee had initiated proceedings for support pursuant to this act or that the proceeding would be of no avail.

If, under this act or a law substantially similar to this act, the governor of another state makes a demand that the governor of this state surrender an individual charged criminally in that state with having failed to provide for the support of a child or other individual to whom a duty of support is owed, the governor may require a prosecutor to investigate the demand and report whether a proceeding for support has been initiated or would be effective. If it appears that a proceeding would be effective but has not been initiated, the governor may delay honoring the demand for a reasonable time to permit the initiation of a` proceeding.

If a proceeding for support has been initiated and the individual whose rendition is demanded prevails, the governor may decline to honor the demand. If the petitioner prevails and the individual whose rendition is demanded is subject to a support order, the governor may decline to honor the demand if the individual is complying with the support order.

History.

Laws 1995, ch. 148, § 1; 1998, ch. 97, § 2; 2005, ch. 103, § 2; 2015 ch. 75, § 2, effective March 2, 2015.

The 2005 amendment,

effective July 1, 2005, deleted “the Uniform Reciprocal Enforcement of Support Act or the Revised Uniform Reciprocal Enforcement of Support Act” following “similar to this act” in the first sentence in (b).

The 2015 amendment,

in (a), substituted “this act” for “the Interstate Family Support Act”; and in (b), substituted “this act” for “the Uniform Interstate Family Support Act.”

Laws 2015, ch. 75, § 6, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 2, 2015.

Meaning of “this act.” —

For the definition of “this act,” referred to in this section, see § 20-4-140(a)(xxii).

§ 20-4-188.
Uniformity of application and construction.

In applying and construing this uniform act, consideration shall be given to the need to promote uniformity of the law with respect to its subject matter among states that enact it.

History.

Laws 1995, ch. 148, § 1; 2005, ch. 103, § 2; 2015 ch. 75, § 2, effective March 2, 2015.

The 2005 amendment,

effective July 1, 2005, revised the language of this section.

The 2015 amendment,

inserted “uniform.”

Laws 2015, ch. 75, § 6, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 2, 2015.

Meaning of “this act.” —

For the meaning of “this act,” referred to in this section, see § 20-4-140(a)(xxii).

§ 20-4-189.
Pending action or proceeding under Revised Uniform Reciprocal Enforcement of Support Act; law applicable.

Any action or proceeding under the Uniform Reciprocal Enforcement of Support Act pending on July 1, 1995, shall continue under the provisions of such act until the court rules on any pending action or proceeding.

History.

Laws 1995, ch. 148, § 1.

§ 20-4-190.
Immunity from civil liability.

An employer that complies with an income withholding order issued in another state in accordance with this article is not subject to civil liability to an individual or agency with regard to the employer’s withholding of child support from the obligor’s income.

History.

Laws 1998, ch. 97, § 1; 2015 ch. 75, § 2, effective March 2, 2015.

The 2015 amendment,

substituted “that complies” for “who complies.”

Laws 2015, ch. 75, § 6, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 2, 2015.

§ 20-4-191.
Penalties for noncompliance.

An employer that willfully fails to comply with an income withholding order issued in another state and received for enforcement is subject to the same penalties that may be imposed for noncompliance with an order issued by a tribunal of this state.

History.

Laws 1998, ch. 97, § 1; 2015 ch. 75, § 2, effective March 2, 2015.

The 2015 amendment,

substituted “that willfully” for “who willfully” and “in another state” for “by another state.”

Laws 2015, ch. 75, § 6, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 2, 2015.

§ 20-4-192.
Contest by obligor.

An obligor may contest the validity or enforcement of an income withholding order issued in another state and received directly by an employer in this state by registering the order in a tribunal of this state and filing a contest to that order as provided in W.S.

20-4-173

through

20-4-184

,

20-4-193

,

20-4-194

and

20-4-197

, or otherwise contesting the order in the same manner as if the order had been issued by a tribunal of this state.

The obligor shall give notice of the contest to:

A support enforcement agency providing services to the obligee;

Each employer that has directly received an income withholding order relating to the obligor; and

The person designated to receive payments in the income withholding order or if no person is designated, to the obligee.

History.

Laws 1998, ch. 97, § 1; 2005, ch. 103, § 2; 2015 ch. 75, § 2, effective March 2, 2015.

The 2005 amendment,

effective July 1, 2005, in (a) inserted “by registering the order in a tribunal of this state and filing a contest to that order as provided in W.S.

20-4-173

through

20-4-197

, or otherwise contesting the order” and deleted “W.S.

20-4-176

applies to the contest” at the end; in (b)(iii) twice deleted “or agency” after “person”; and made stylistic changes.

The 2015 amendment,

substituted “20-4-184,

20-4-193

,

20-4-194

and

20-4-197

” for “20-4-197.”

Laws 2015, ch. 75, § 6, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 2, 2015.

§ 20-4-193.
Jurisdiction to modify child support order of another state when individual parties reside in this state.

If all of the parties who are individuals reside in this state and the child does not reside in the issuing state, a tribunal of this state has jurisdiction to enforce and to modify the issuing state’s child support order in a proceeding to register that order.

A tribunal of this state exercising jurisdiction under this section shall apply the provisions of W.S.

20-4-139

through

20-4-150

,

20-4-173

through

20-4-184

,

20-4-193

through

20-4-198

and the procedural and substantive law of this state to the proceeding for enforcement or modification. W.S.

20-4-151

through

20-4-172

,

20-4-185

through

20-4-187

,

20-4-190

through

20-4-192

,

20-4-198

and

20-4-201

through

20-4-213

do not apply.

History.

Laws 1998, ch. 97, § 1; 2015 ch. 75, § 2, effective March 2, 2015.

The 2015 amendment,

in (b), substituted “20-4-150,

20-4-173

through

20-4-184

,

20-4-193

through

20-4-198

” for “20-4-143,

20-4-173

through

20-4-184

,

20-4-193

,

20-4-194

” and “20-4-190 through

20-4-192

,

20-4-198

and

20-4-201

through

20-4-213

” for “and

20-4-190

through

20-4-192

”; and made related changes.

Laws 2015, ch. 75, § 6, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 2, 2015.

§ 20-4-194.
Notice to issuing tribunal of modification.

Within thirty (30) days after issuance of a modified child support order, the party obtaining the modification shall file a certified copy of the order with the issuing tribunal that had continuing, exclusive jurisdiction over the earlier order, and in each tribunal in which the party knows the earlier order has been registered. A party who obtains the order and fails to file a certified copy is subject to appropriate sanctions by a tribunal in which the issue of failure to file arises. The failure to file does not affect the validity or enforceability of the modified order of the new tribunal having continuing, exclusive jurisdiction.

History.

Laws 1998, ch. 97, § 1.

§ 20-4-195.
Application of act to nonresident subject to personal jurisdiction.

A tribunal of this state exercising personal jurisdiction over a nonresident in a proceeding under this act, under other law of this state relating to a support order, or recognizing a foreign support order may receive evidence from outside this state pursuant to W.S.

20-4-166

, communicate with a tribunal of outside this state pursuant to W.S.

20-4-167

, and obtain discovery through a tribunal outside this state pursuant to W.S.

20-4-168

. In all other respects, W.S.

20-4-151

through

20-4-185

,

20-4-190

,

20-4-194

and

20-4-197

do not apply and the tribunal shall apply the procedural and substantive law of this state.

History.

Laws 2005, ch. 103, § 1; 2015 ch. 75, § 2, effective March 2, 2015.

The 2015 amendment,

in (b), substituted “foreign support order” for “support order of a foreign country or political subdivision on the basis of comity,” “outside this state” for “another state” three times, and “W.S.

20-4-151

through

20-4-185

,

20-4-190

,

20-4-194

and

20-4-197

” for “W.S.

20-4-151

through

20-4-185

”; and made related changes.

Laws 2015, ch. 75, § 6, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 2, 2015.

Effective dates. —

Laws 2005, ch. 103, § 4, makes the act effective July 1, 2005.

§ 20-4-196.
Continuing exclusive jurisdiction to modify spousal support order.

A tribunal of this state issuing a spousal support order consistent with the law of this state has continuing, exclusive jurisdiction to modify the spousal support order throughout the existence of the support obligation.

A tribunal of this state may not modify a spousal support order issued by a tribunal of another state or a foreign country having continuing, exclusive jurisdiction over that order under the law of that state or foreign country.

A tribunal of this state that has continuing, exclusive jurisdiction over a spousal support order may serve as:

An initiating tribunal to request a tribunal of another state to enforce the spousal support order issued in this state; or

A responding tribunal to enforce or modify its own spousal support order.

History.

Laws 2005, ch. 103, § 1; 2015 ch. 75, § 2, effective March 2, 2015.

The 2015 amendment,

in (b), inserted “or a foreign country” or similar language twice.

Laws 2015, ch. 75, § 6, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 2, 2015.

Effective dates. —

Laws 2005, ch. 103, § 4, makes the act effective July 1, 2005.

§ 20-4-197.
Jurisdiction to modify child support order of foreign country.

Except as provided in W.S.

20-4-211

, if a foreign country lacks or refuses to exercise jurisdiction to modify its child support order pursuant to its laws, a tribunal of this state may assume jurisdiction to modify the child support order and bind all individuals subject to the personal jurisdiction of the tribunal whether the consent to modification of a child support order otherwise required of the individual pursuant to W.S.

20-4-183

has been given or whether the individual seeking modification is a resident of this state or of the foreign country.

An order issued by a tribunal of this state modifying a foreign child support order pursuant to this section is the controlling order.

History.

Laws 2005, ch. 103, § 1; 2015 ch. 75, § 2, effective March 2, 2015.

The 2015 amendment,

in (a), added the exception, substituted “lacks or refuses to exercise jurisdiction to modify its child support order” for “or political subdivision that is a state will not or may not modify its order,” and deleted “or political subdivision” at the end; in (b), inserted “by a tribunal of this state modifying a foreign child support order”; and made related changes.

Laws 2015, ch. 75, § 6, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 2, 2015.

§ 20-4-198.
State tribunal and support enforcement agency.

The district courts enumerated in W.S.

5-3-101

are the tribunals of this state.

The Wyoming department of family services is the support enforcement agency of this state.

History.

2015 ch. 75, § 1, effective March 2, 2015.

Effective date. —

Laws 2015, ch. 75, § 1, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 2, 2015.